src/morphology/affixes/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON Zateq_meqZ
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg:	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutiga	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutit	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaa	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutini	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCuterput	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtarput	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutersi	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtarsi	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaat	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaat	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutertik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abs+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtartik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmip	Krestr ;  
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutima	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutivit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaata	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutimi	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitta	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatta	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissi	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassi	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaata	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaata	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutimik	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Rel+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtamik	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmimut	TrmVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnut	TrmVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCuternut	TrmVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaanut	TrmVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminut	TrmVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsinnut	TrmVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnut	TrmVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissinnut	TrmVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassinnut	TrmVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaannut	TrmVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaannut	TrmVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminnut	TrmVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Trm+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaminnut	TrmVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmimit	AblVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnit	AblVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnit	AblVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCuternit	AblVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaanit	AblVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminit	AblVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsinnit	AblVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnit	AblVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissinnit	AblVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassinnit	AblVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaannit	AblVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaannit	AblVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminnit	AblVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaminnit	AblVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmimiit	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaaniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminiit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsinniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsinniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissinniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+2PlPoss:%>ertassinniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaanniit	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaanniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Abl+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaminniit	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmimi	LokVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinni	LokVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaani	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutimini	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissinni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassinni	LokVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaanni	LokVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaanni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Lok+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaminni	LokVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmitut	AeqVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutittut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutittut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaatut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutimisut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsitut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsitut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissitut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassitut	AeqVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaattut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaattut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutimittut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Aeq+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtamittut	AeqVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmimik	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutinnik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaanik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsinnik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsinnik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissinnik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassinnik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaannik	Krestr ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaannik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Ins+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutiminnik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Ins+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaminnik	Krestr ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg:%>%VCTRUNCmikkut	ViaVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+1SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+2SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutikkut	ViaVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaagut	ViaVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+4SgPoss:%>%TRUNCutimigut	ViaVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutitsigut	ViaVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+1PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtatsigut	ViaVb ;
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutissigut	ViaVb ;
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+2PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtassigut	ViaVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutaatigut	ViaVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+3PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtaatigut	ViaVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+Prop+Via+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCutimikkut	ViaVb ; 
+Sem/Hum+TAQ+Der/nn+Prop+Via+Sg+4PlPoss:%>%TRUNCrtamikkut	ViaVb ; 




LEXICON Z1geoSZmorf !Narsaq
+Sem/Geo+Prop+LIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliar	IV_r ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIU+Der/nn:%>miu	Z1Zmorf ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIU+Der/nn+Orth/Alt:%>-miu	Z1Zmorf ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIU+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrmiu	Z1Zmorf ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIUQ+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>mioq	K ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIUQ+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCrmioq	K ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+U+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu	IV_voq ;
		Z1geoSZ ;


LEXICON Z1geoPZmorf !Paamiut og Ivittuut
+Sem/Geo+Prop+LIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliar	IV_r ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIU+Der/nn:%>miu	Z1Zmorf ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIU+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCrmiu	Z1Zmorf ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIUQ+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>%TRUNCrmioq	K ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIUQ+Der/nn+N+Abs+Sg:%>mioq	K ;
+Sem/Geo+Prop+U@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCu@U.Num.Pl@	IV_voq ;
		Z1geoPZ ;

!LEXICON Z1geo_lukPZmorf !Iqaluit PL udkommentering 20150129
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+LIAR+Der/nv:%>%TRUNCliar	IV_r ;
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIU+Der/nn:%>miu	Z1Zmorf ;
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+MIUQ+Der/nn:%>mioq	Z1Zmorf ;
!+Sem/Geo+Prop+U@U.Num.Pl@+Der/nn:%>%TRUNCu@U.Num.Pl@	IV_voq ;
!		Z1geo_lukPZ ;
