src/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
LEXICON ateq
Mandalay Z1geoSZmorf ;
Aabenraa Z1geoSZmorf ;
Abana Z1geoSZmorf ;
Abu% Dhabi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Adria Z1geoSZmorf ;
Agri Z1geoSZmorf ;
Akureyri Z1geoSZmorf ;
Albufeira Z1geoSZmorf ;
Alta Z1geoSZmorf ;
Ancona Z1geoSZmorf ;
Angola Z1geoSZmorf ;
Antigua Z1geoSZmorf ;
Apia Z1geoSZmorf ;
Arabia Z1geoSZmorf ;
Arimatæa Z1geoSZmorf ;
Arresø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Asia Z1geoSZmorf ;
Assosi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Athabasca Z1geoSZmorf ;
Attalia Z1geoSZmorf ;
Avigaat:Avigaaq Z1geoPZmorf ;
Avila Z1geoSZmorf ;
Babeli Z1geoSZmorf ;
Baku Z1geoSZmorf ;
Baotou Z1geoSZmorf ;
Barsø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Benin% City Z1geoSZmorf ;
Betania Z1geoSZmorf ;
Betsajda Z1geoSZmorf ;
Bjergby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Bodø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Bologna Z1geoSZmorf ;
Bosnien-Herzegovina Z1geoSZmorf ;
Bratislava Z1geoSZmorf ;
Brundby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Brøndby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Buresø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Bursø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Calcutta Z1geoSZmorf ;
Camp% Century	Z1geoSZmorf ;
Canberra Z1geoSZmorf ;
Casablanca Z1geoSZmorf ;
Centralamerika Z1geoSZmorf ;
Christiania Z1geoSZmorf ;
Columbia Z1geoSZmorf ;
Costa Z1geoSZmorf ;
Cyperni Z1geoSZmorf ;
Dalby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Damaskusi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Davisstrædi Z1geoSZmorf ;
District% of% Columbia Z1geoSZmorf ;
Doha Z1geoSZmorf ;
Drejø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Dybsø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Efesosi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Egå Z1geoSZmorf ;
Elsø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Eufrati Z1geoSZmorf ;
Fiji Z1geoSZmorf ;
Fodby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Frederiksø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Furreby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Gabbata Z1geoSZmorf ;
Gammelå Z1geoSZmorf ;
Gethsemani Z1geoSZmorf ;
Gran% Canaria Z1geoSZmorf ; 
Guadalajara Z1geoSZmorf ;
Gårdeby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Haparanda Z1geoSZmorf ;
Hekla Z1geoSZmorf ;
Hjarnø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Honolulu Z1geoSZmorf ;
Husby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Hørby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Ikamiut Z1geoPZmorf ;
Ikamiut:Ikamiu Z1geoPZmorf ;
Illoqqortoormiut:Illoqqortoormioq Z1geoPZmorf ;
India Z1geoSZmorf ;
Itaalia Z1geoSZmorf ;
Ittaajimmiit:Ittaajimmeeq Z1geoPZmorf ; !til østgrønlandsk bøjning
Ittaajimmiit:Ittaajimmioq Z1geoPZmorf ;
Ittoqqortoormiit:Ittoqqortoormeeq Z1geoPZmorf ;
Ittoqqortoormiit:Ittoqqortoormioq Z1geoPZmorf ;
Ivissigaartut Z1geoPZmorf ;
Ivittuut:Ivittooq Z1geoPZmorf ;
Jeriko:Jeriko%PROP Z1geoSZmorf ;
Judæa Z1geoSZmorf ;
Kampuchea Z1geoSZmorf ;
Kangaamiut:Kangaamioq Z1geoPZmorf ;
Kapernaumi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Karlskrona Z1geoSZmorf ;
Kentucky Z1geoSZmorf ;
Kiosi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Klinkby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Kongeå Z1geoSZmorf ;
Kouvola:Kouv2ola Z1geoSZmorf ;
Kuummiut:Kuummiu Z1geoPZmorf ;
Kuunnaaq Z1geoSZmorf ;
La% Plata Z1geoSZmorf ;
Langø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Leby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Livø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Lundby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Lyngby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Madeira Z1geoSZmorf ;
Malawi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Managua Z1geoSZmorf ;
Manermiut:Manermioq Z1geoPZmorf ;
Maseru Z1geoSZmorf ;
Messina Z1geoSZmorf ;
Mitylene:Mitylene%PROP Z1geoSZmorf ;
Moriusaq Z1geoSZmorf ;
Munkeby Z1geoSZmorf ;
N'Djamena Z1geoSZmorf ;
Naajaat Z1geoPZmorf ;
Napoli Z1geoSZmorf ;
Nekselø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Niaqornaq Z1geoSZmorf ;
Nizza Z1geoSZmorf ;
Norge:Norge%PROP Z1geoSZmorf ;
Næstelsø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Oklahoma% City Z1geoSZmorf ;
Oqaatsoq Z1geoPZmorf ;
Ouagadougou Z1geoSZmorf ;
Paamiut:Paamioq Z1geoPZmorf ;
Palæstina Z1geoSZmorf ;
Patara Z1geoSZmorf ;
Peru Z1geoSZmorf ;
Pompeji Z1geoSZmorf ;
Pretoria Z1geoSZmorf ;
Qulumit:Qulumi	Z1geoPZmorf ;
Rakkeby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Rhodosi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Roma Z1geoSZmorf ;
Rwanda Z1geoSZmorf ;
Sahara Z1geoSZmorf ;
Saltø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Santa% Ana Z1geoSZmorf ;
Savalimmiut:Savalimmiu Z1geoPZmorf ;
Scoresbysundi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Sevilla Z1geoSZmorf ;
Siloa Z1geoSZmorf ;
Sisimiut Z1geoPZmorf ;
Skarø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Skærsø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Solna Z1geoSZmorf ;
Sprogø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Strandby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Sundby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Swansea Z1geoSZmorf ;
Syrakusi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Tabernæ Z1geoSZmorf ;
Tasiilaq Z1geoSZmorf ;
Thurø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Tissø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Toscana Z1geoSZmorf ;
Tunø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Tødsø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Uggerby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Utoqqarmiut Z1geoPZmorf ;
Uummannaq+Orth/Arch+Err/Sub:Umanak Z1geoSZmorf ;
Valencia Z1geoSZmorf ;
Vanuatu Z1geoSZmorf ;
Vejleby Z1geoSZmorf ;
Vestamerika Z1geoSZmorf ;
Vigsø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Voerså Z1geoSZmorf ;
Washingtonlandi Z1geoSZmorf ;
Zhangjiakou Z1geoSZmorf ;
Årø Z1geoSZmorf ;
Ørsø Z1geoSZmorf ;
